Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.50.903

Coordination and alignment of aerospace training programs—Aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing pipeline advisory committee.

(1) The state board for community and technical colleges, in collaboration with aerospace or advanced materials long-term training providers, short-term training providers whose mission is focused on customized and innovative short-term training, and apprenticeship program providers, shall facilitate coordination and alignment of aerospace training programs to the maximum extent possible. This coordination and alignment shall include but not be limited to the following activities:

(a) Providing up-to-date information about the aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing training programs in the state;

(b) Providing information about grants and partnership opportunities;

(c) Providing coordination for professional development for faculty and other education and training providers;

(d) Evaluating programs identified by the aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing pipeline advisory committee annually for completion and job placement results; and

(e) Making budget recommendations to the governor and the legislature specific to the aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing training programs.

(2) The state board for community and technical colleges shall establish an aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing pipeline advisory committee consisting of not less than eleven nor more than fifteen members. A majority of members shall represent industry with the chair selected by the committee from among the industry members. Members of the advisory committee shall also include at least two persons representing labor who represent aerospace or advanced materials production workers and also include education and training providers including, but not limited to, the director of a long-term training program, the director of a short-term training program whose mission is to focus on customized and innovative short-term training, and the director of an apprenticeship program. The advisory committee's duties include but are not limited to:

(a) Providing direction for a skills gap analysis that is: (i) Produced with the workforce training and education coordinating board using data developed through the education data center; and (ii) consistent with the joint assessment by the higher education coordinating board or its successor, the state board for community and technical colleges, and the workforce training and education coordinating board of the number and type of higher education and training credentials required to match employer demand for a skilled and educated workforce;

(b) Establishing goals for students served, program completion rates, and employment rates;

(c) Coordinating and disseminating industry advice for aerospace and advanced materials manufacturing training programs; and

(d) Recommending training programs for review by the workforce training and education coordinating board in coordination with the state board for community and technical colleges.

(3) All requirements in this section are subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for the specific purposes described.

[ 2012 c 50 s 2.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2012 c 50: "The legislature finds that a skilled workforce is essential for employers and job seekers to compete and grow Washington's aerospace industry as part of the global economy. The legislature intends to improve coordination of the state's training system for skilled aerospace workers in order to provide better alignment with industry needs in the present and over the long term for both two-year training programs, short-term training, and relevant apprenticeship programs to keep pace with a rapidly changing industry. The legislature further intends to increase aerospace skill development and education and training programs and help increase jobs for Washington's citizens." [ 2012 c 50 s 1.]